New York, session 2025-2026, A9596.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 19-0301 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. a. Any rules or regulations relating to hydrofluorocarbon 4 substances established or implemented by the department shall conform 5 with, and shall not exceed, any applicable rules or regulations set 6 forth in 40 C.F.R. Part 84, as in effect on October first, two thousand 7 twenty-five. For purposes of this subdivision, "hydrofluorocarbon 8 substances" shall mean any substances used in air conditioning and 9 refrigeration equipment, aerosol propellants, foams, or solvents, as 10 listed or regulated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7675 and its implementing 11 regulations at 40 C.F.R. Part 84. 12 b. Any state regulation, requirement, or prohibition relating to 13 hydrofluorocarbon substances that imposes standards more stringent than 14 those set forth in 40 C.F.R. Part 84, as in effect on October first, two 15 thousand twenty-five, is hereby repealed, superseded, and of no further 16 force or effect to the extent it is more stringent than such applicable 17 federal regulation. 18 c. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to: 19 (1) limit the state's authority to regulate greenhouse gas emissions 20 generally pursuant to article seventy-five of this chapter; 21 (2) restrict programs addressing energy efficiency, electrification, 22 refrigerant reclamation, or other measures consistent with the New York 23 state climate leadership and community protection act; or 24 (3) prevent the department from enforcing labeling, reporting, or 25 reclamation requirements identical to federal requirements for purposes 26 of consistency and compliance assistance. 27 § 2. Severability. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, 28 section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14387-01-6 A. 9596 2 1 jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or 2 invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation 3 to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part thereof 4 directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have 5 been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legislature 6 that this act would have been enacted even if such invalid provisions 7 had not been included herein. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.